Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-607
Pupil transportation vehicles; State Board of Education; rules and regulations; violations; penalty.

The State Board of Education shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for operators of pupil transportation vehicles as to physical and mental qualities, driving skills and practices, and knowledge of traffic laws, rules, and regulations which relate to school bus transportation. Such traffic rules and regulations shall by reference be made a part of any such contract with a school district. Any officer or employee of any school district who violates any of the traffic rules or regulations or fails to include obligations to comply with the traffic rules and regulations in any contract executed by him or her on behalf of a school district may be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor and may, upon conviction thereof, be subject to removal from office or employment. Any person operating a school bus under contract with a school district who fails to comply with any of such traffic rules and regulations may be guilty of breach of contract, and such person may be dismissed or such contract may be canceled after notice and hearing by such school district.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 368;

Laws 2016, LB1066, § 6.

A school bus driver's contract is valid and enforceable if he complies with the statutory requirements before operating a bus, notwithstanding a failure to fully comply before the contract was entered into. Rase v. Southeast Nebraska Consol. School Dist., 190 Neb. 800, 212 N.W.2d 629 (1973).